Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Bargaining Agent

§ 1991.
Selection of representation.

Teachers and administrators may select organizations to represent them on their negotiations council in collective negotiations with the school board negotiations council. The school board shall recognize an organization as the exclusive representative of the teachers or of the administrators in the school district when that organization has proved its claim to sole and exclusive representative status of the respective group as provided in this chapter. The superintendent, the assistant superintendent, and the principal shall not serve as negotiating agents for the teachers’ organization.

When close or disputed questions of eligibility to vote and inclusion in the unit to be represented by the teachers’ organization arise, the general principle to be adhered to shall be that eligibility to vote and inclusion in that negotiating unit will be limited to all teachers in the school district under contract and actually engaged in full-time or part-time positions that are not that of administrator.

The organizations selected to represent teachers or administrators shall represent without discrimination or prejudice all of those eligible for inclusion in the negotiating unit without regard to organizational affiliation or membership.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 127

, § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1969; amended

2007, No. 82

, § 30;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 175, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1992.
Referendum procedure for representation.

An organization purporting to represent a majority of all of the teachers or administrators employed by the school board may be recognized by the school board without the necessity of a referendum upon the submission of a petition bearing the valid signatures of a majority of the teachers or administrators employed by that school board. Within 15 calendar days after receiving the petition, the school board shall notify the teachers or administrators of the school district in writing of its intention to either require or waive a secret ballot referendum. If the school board gives notice of its intention to waive a referendum and recognize an organization, 10 percent of the teachers or administrators employed by the school board may submit a petition within 15 calendar days thereafter, objecting to the granting of recognition without a referendum, in which event a secret ballot referendum shall be held in the district for the purpose of choosing an exclusive representative as provided pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(a) (1) An organization purporting to represent a majority of all of the teachers or administrators employed by the school board may be recognized by the school board without the necessity of a referendum upon the submission of a petition bearing the valid signatures of a majority of the teachers or administrators employed by that school board. Within 15 calendar days after receiving the petition, the school board shall notify the teachers or administrators of the school district in writing of its intention to either require or waive a secret ballot referendum. If the school board gives notice of its intention to waive a referendum and recognize an organization, 10 percent of the teachers or administrators employed by the school board may submit a petition within 15 calendar days thereafter, objecting to the granting of recognition without a referendum, in which event a secret ballot referendum shall be held in the district for the purpose of choosing an exclusive representative as provided pursuant to the provisions of this section.

An organization seeking to represent the teachers or administrators employed by a school board may petition the school board for a list of the teachers or administrators in the proposed bargaining unit.

An organization or group of teachers or administrators, or any person purporting to act on their behalf, that is seeking to demonstrate that the current exclusive representative of the teachers or administrators is no longer supported by a majority of the teachers or administrators employed by that school board shall not be entitled to obtain a list of the employees in the bargaining unit pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2).

Unless the parties agree to a longer period, within five business days after receiving the petition, the school board shall file with the organization a list of the names and job titles of the teachers or administrators in the proposed bargaining unit. To the extent possible, the list of employees shall be in alphabetical order by last name and provided in electronic format.

Recognition granted to a negotiating unit as exclusive representative shall be valid and not subject to challenge by referendum petition or otherwise for the remainder of the fiscal year in which recognition is granted and for an additional period of 12 months after final adoption of the budget for the succeeding fiscal year and shall continue thereafter until a new referendum is called for.

A secret ballot referendum shall be held not more than 21 calendar days after 20 percent of the teachers or administrators employed by the school board present a petition requesting a referendum on the matter of representation, except during a period of prior recognition, as provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(c) (1) (A) A secret ballot referendum shall be held not more than 21 calendar days after 20 percent of the teachers or administrators employed by the school board present a petition requesting a referendum on the matter of representation, except during a period of prior recognition, as provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The parties may mutually agree to extend the time to hold the election set forth in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1).

Any organization interested in representing teachers or administrators in the school district shall have the right to appear on the ballot by submitting a petition supported by ten percent or more of the teachers or administrators in the school district.

Unless the school board and the organization agree to a longer period, within two business days after the petition is presented, the school board shall file with the organization that will be named on the ballot a list of the teachers or administrators in the bargaining unit.
(2) (A) Unless the school board and the organization agree to a longer period, within two business days after the petition is presented, the school board shall file with the organization that will be named on the ballot a list of the teachers or administrators in the bargaining unit.

The list shall include, as appropriate, each teacher’s or administrator’s name, work location, job classification, and contact information. As used in this subdivision (2), “contact information” includes a teacher’s or administrator’s home address, personal e-mail address, and home and personal cellular telephone numbers to the extent that the school board is in possession of such information.

To the extent possible, the list of teachers or administrators shall be in alphabetical order by last name and provided in electronic format.

The list shall be kept confidential by the school board and the organization and shall be exempt from copying and inspection under the Public Records Act.

Failure to file the list within the time required pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be an unfair labor practice and may be grounds for the Vermont Labor Relations Board to set aside the results of the referendum if an unfair labor practice charge is filed not more than 10 business days after the referendum.

In the interest of expediting the referendum and minimizing the cost thereof, the petitioning party or parties and the school board may agree together to conduct cooperatively the referendum themselves. Alternatively, the parties may select an impartial person or agency to conduct or aid in the conducting of the referendum. Failing agreement among all interested parties on the conduct of the referendum, any of the petitioning parties or the school board may request that the referendum be conducted with the aid and assistance of the American Arbitration Association or its designee. The American Arbitration Association or its designee shall have the responsibility for making decisions on any and all matters in dispute regarding the mechanics of the referendum, eligibility, and other necessary decisions relating to the conduct of the referendum.

All costs incurred in conducting the referendum shall be borne jointly by the school board and the petitioners.

The ballot used in any referendum shall include “no representation” among the choices. The organization designated by the majority of the votes cast shall be the negotiating representative. If the majority is “no representation,” then the school board may not recognize any representative for at least 12 months thereafter. If no choice receives a majority vote, then a run-off referendum shall be conducted among the two choices receiving the greatest number of votes.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 127

, § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1969; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 90;

2019, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.